Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-161
Territorial maps; violations; penalty.

Any person who violates section 86-130 is guilty of a Class V misdemeanor. The commission shall enforce such section, and the Attorney General or any county attorney shall, upon request of the commission, assist in the prosecution of any violations of such section.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. VI, § 6, p. 1419;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 470;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 101;

Laws 2000, LB 1285, § 10;

R.S.Supp.,2000, § 75-606;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 60.